New York, session 2025-2026, A1922.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3.09 of the parks, recreation and historic preser- 2 vation law is amended by adding a new subdivision 24 to read as follows: 3 24. Promulgate rules and regulations requiring the installation and 4 use of automatic license plate reader systems at all entrances and exits 5 to state parks, state historic sites and state recreational facilities 6 and to assist municipalities in establishing policies and procedures for 7 the installation and use of automatic license plate reader systems at 8 all entrances and exits to municipal parks, municipal historic sites, 9 and municipal recreational facilities. For purposes of this section, 10 "automatic license plate reader system" or "ALPR system" shall mean a 11 system of one or more mobile or fixed high-speed cameras used in combi- 12 nation with computer algorithms to convert images of license plates into 13 computer-readable data. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04983-01-5